Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.320

Possession no defense.

The fact that any person or corporation against whom such action may be brought is in the possession of such property, or evidence of title to such property, shall not prevent the maintenance of such suit.

[ 1929 c 100 s 2; RRS s 809-2.]